Maine, session 132, LD142.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 9-B MRSA §241, sub-§16 is enacted to read:
16. Prohibition on charging more than one fee for insufficient funds associated
with the same withdrawal transaction. A financial institution authorized to do business
in this State or a credit union authorized to do business in this State may not charge a
customer's account more than one fee for insufficient funds associated with the same
withdrawal transaction even if more than one withdrawal attempt is made.